Nevada, session 83, AB129.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 116.31086 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
116.31086 1. [If an association solicits bids for an association
project:
(a) The] Except as provided in subsection 2, an association
[must, whenever reasonably possible,] shall solicit at least three bids
if [the] an association project is expected to cost:
-
*AB129*

– 2 –
[(1)] (a) In a common-interest community that consists of
less than 1,000 units, 3 percent or more of the annual budget of the
association; or
[(2)] (b) In a common-interest community that consists of
1,000 or more units, 1 percent or more of the annual budget of the
association . [; and
(b)] 2. An association is not required to solicit bids for an
association project described in subsection 1 if any undue delay in
the commencement of the association project could exacerbate
property damage or pose a risk of injury.
3. The bids must be opened and read aloud during a meeting of
the executive board.
[2.] 4. An association shall award the contract for an
association project to the lowest responsive bidder.
5. As used in this section, “association project” includes,
without limitation, a project that involves the maintenance, repair,
replacement or restoration of any part of the common elements or
which involves the provision of professional services to the
association, including, without limitation, accounting, engineering
and legal services.
H
-
*AB129*